src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* **adjectives ;**
* **adpositions ;**
* **adverbs ;**
* **conjunctors ;**
* **interjections ;**
* **nouns ;**
* **particles ;**
* **pronouns ;**
* **propernouns ;**
* **quantifiers ;**
* **verbs ;**
* **Abbreviation ;**
* **Acronym ;**
* **Punctuation ;**
* **Symbols ;**
* **EXCEPTIONS ;**
* **A_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new adjectives
* **ADV_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new adverbs
* **N_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new nouns
* **PROP_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new propernouns
* **V_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new verbs
* **QUESTIONABLEMISC_NEWWORDS ;** This is for feeding new words of questionable status

Lexica for words that are not inflected

These are but here for the time being

adverb lexicon

* LEXICON ADV_KĒRATÕKS

* LEXICON ADV_KǬRAND

* LEXICON ADV_IRM

Interjections lexicon

pcle-mod lexicon

pcle-lexicon

This is used in compounding, e.g. äʼb-:äʼb

* **LEXICON K** is the clitic lexicon, but no clitica here, only #.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
